Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1939
Tax foreclosure proceedings; defects subsequent to decree of foreclosure; application to complete proceedings.

The application provided for in section 77-1938 shall be filed in the original tax foreclosure proceeding wherein the decree of foreclosure was rendered. The application shall set forth: (1) The nature of the interest of the applicant in the property and how it was acquired; (2) the defect or defects which rendered proceedings subsequent to the decree of foreclosure defective, invalid, or void; (3) the taxes and special assessments which have become a lien since the entry of the decree of foreclosure, and the amount thereof, if any, paid by the applicant; (4) the improvements, if any, placed upon the property since the decree of foreclosure by the applicant or any person under whom he claims an interest in the property; and (5) any other facts proper for a court of equity to take into consideration in determining the rights, equities, and liens of the parties in and to the premises described in the tax foreclosure proceedings. The application shall conclude with a request that the court order the foreclosure proceedings to be properly completed and the rights of all parties arising subsequent to the decree of foreclosure be adjusted and determined.

Laws 1949, c. 240, § 2, p. 652.